Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.300

Relevance of failure to cause juvenile to attend school to neglect petition.

The legislature finds that it is the responsibility of the custodial parent, parents or guardian to ensure that children within the custody of such individuals attend school as provided for by law. To this end, while a parent's failure to cause a juvenile to attend school should not alone provide a basis for a neglect petition against the parent or guardian, when a neglect petition is filed on the basis of other evidence, a parent or guardian's failure to take reasonable steps to ensure that the juvenile attends school may be relevant to the question of the appropriate disposition of a neglect petition.

[ 2000 c 122 s 34; 1979 ex.s. c 201 s 3.]